Hawaii statutes.
[§584-10] Pretrial proceedings. As
soon as practicable after an action to declare the existence or nonexistence of
the father and child relationship has been brought, an informal hearing shall
be held. The public shall be barred from the hearing. A record of the
proceeding or any portion thereof shall be kept if any party requests, or the
court orders. Rules of evidence need not be observed. [L 1975, c 66, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Pre-trial procedure, see HFCR rule 16.

Case Notes

In a paternity action, §584-13 and this section mandate that
an informal, pre-trial hearing be held by the court to evaluate the likelihood
of establishing at trial the alleged father as the natural father, to determine
whether declaring paternity would be in the best interest of the child, and to
recommend settlement to the parties; such a hearing is not required before a
court may order genetic testing of the parties. 88 H. 159 (App.), 963 P.2d
1135.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next